Louisiana, session 2026, HB1060.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 43:24(C) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§24. Acts; numbering; printing; publication
* * *
C. The secretary of state shall take all necessary actions to cause transmit the
acts and joint resolutions of the legislature to be made accessible on the Internet
website or portal of the Official Journal of the State within the time limits established
by R.S. 43:81.
* * *